Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1157.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(l)(3)(G)(a) and (a.1) of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, are amended to read:Section 4. Definitions.--The following words and phrases, as used in this act, shall have the following meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.123456789101112131415161718192021222324 * * *(l) * * *(3) "Employment" shall also include--* * *(G) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this act, service performed [after December 31, 1977,] by an individual in agricultural labor as defined in section 4(l)(4)(1) when:(a) Such service is performed for a person who--(1) during any calendar quarter in either the current or the preceding calendar year paid remuneration in cash of twenty thousand dollars or more to individuals employed in agricultural labor [(not taking into account service in agricultural labor performed before January 1, 1982, by an alien referred to in section 4(l)(3)(G)(a.1) or 4(l)(2)(G)(a.1))] (including labor performed by an alien referred to in section 4(l)(3)(G)(a.1)); or(2) for some portion of a day in each of twenty different calendar weeks, whether or not such weeks were consecutive, in either the current or the preceding calendar year, employed in agricultural labor [(not taking into account service in agricultural labor performed before January 1, 1982, by an alien referred to in section 4(l)(3)(G)(a.1))] (including labor performed by an alien referred to in section 4(l)(3)(G)(a.1)) ten or more individuals, regardless of whether they were employed at the same moment of time.(a.1) Such service is not performed in agricultural labor if performed [before January 1, 1982,] by an individual who is an alien admitted to the United States to perform service in agricultural labor pursuant to sections 214(c) and 101(a)(15)(H) of the Immigration and Nationality Act.20250HB1157PN1284 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 2. This act shall apply to service performed after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1157PN1284 - 3 - 1234